South Dakota, session 2026, SB235.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. This Act is known as the "Data Center Bill of Rights for Citizens."
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 10-45:
There are exempted from the provisions of this chapter, and the tax imposed by it, the gross
receipts from a purchase made by a data center, as defined in section 4 of this Act.
Section 3. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 10-46:
There are exempted from the provisions of this chapter, and the tax imposed by it, the gross
receipts from a purchase made by a data center, as defined in section 4 of this Act.
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to a NEW CHAPTER in title 49:
For purposes of this chapter, "data center" means a centralized repository for the
dissemination, management, processing, and storage of electronic data and information
with a total design load greater than one hundred megawatts.
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to a NEW CHAPTER in title 49:
The operator of a data center shall pay for all fair, just, and reasonable costs
associated with the provision of electricity to the data center.
A provider of electricity may not:
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

235A 2 235
(1) Increase fees, rates, or surcharges imposed on residential customers for the
purpose of financing, offsetting, or subsidizing a data center's infrastructure costs, service
demands, or utility consumption; or
(2) Allocate to residential customers any cost associated with the distribution,
generation, or transmission infrastructure, or any other cost, attributable to the data
center shall establish and maintain separate terms and conditions for electric service
applicable to a data center. The terms and conditions must require that the data center
reimburse any provider of electricity for all costs fairly attributed to the data center for
service demand and utility consumption, including costs incurred to serve the data center
if the data center departs the system or materially reduces its load.
Section 3. That a NEW SECTION be added to a NEW CHAPTER in title 49:
The state may not preempt or otherwise limit the authority of the governing body
of a county, municipality, or other political subdivision to adopt ordinances and resolutions
limiting, prohibiting, or otherwise regulating the construction, development, or operation
of data centers.
Section 4. That a NEW SECTION be added to a NEW CHAPTER in title 49:
Prior to commencing operation in this state, the operator of a data center shall
provide notice of projected water consumption to each local water provider in the area in
which the data center is proposed to be located. Each water provider receiving notice
pursuant to this section shall determine whether the data center's projected water
consumption is compatible with the local water supply and issue that determination in
writing to the operator. The operator shall present a copy of each notice and determination
to the Board of Water Management.
If the board receives a determination from each applicable water provider that the
data center's projected water consumption is compatible with the local water supply, the
board must issue, to the operator and the general public, a written statement that the
operator has satisfied the requirements of this section.
Notwithstanding the board's issuance of a written statement pursuant to this
section, the data center may not consume an amount of the local water supply exceeding
limits established by order of the board, after allocation to residential and essential public
services. In establishing allocation limits under this section, the board shall seek to ensure
water availability and prevent disproportionate use of water by data centers.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

235A 3 235
Section 5. That a NEW SECTION be added to a NEW CHAPTER in title 49:
The operator of a data center that is authorized to operate in this state pursuant
to this chapter, shall, at the time and in the manner prescribed by the Board of Water
Management, submit to the board a semi-annual report regarding the data center's water
use. The report must contain average usage data and certify compliance with this section.
The board shall make the usage data contained in the report available to the public.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.